Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB377.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 62 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3914. Contracts for information technology commodities and services.A contract for the procurement of end point devices shall require that those devices, services and solutions be capable of being configured, secured and maintained in a manner that meets the National Institute of Standards and Technology THE PROCUREMENT OF END POINT DEVICES SHALL MEET NATIONAL OR WIDELY ADOPTED CERTIFICATIONS, SECURITY STANDARDS, INDUSTRY BEST PRACTICES FOR COMPUTER SECURITY OR guidelines in the National Institute of Standards and Technology Special Publication 800- series that are in effect at the time of the effective date of <--<--12345678910111213141516171819 this section or industry best practices for computer security to the extent that the guidelines or industry best practices are applicable to the end point devices, services and solutions being procured. As used in this section, the term "end point device" shall mean any Internet capable computer hardware device on a transmission control protocol or Internet protocol network.Section 2. This act shall only apply to a contract entered into on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0377PN0865 - 2 - <--123456789